Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3608.01
Advertisement; director; powers.

Every issuer of medicare supplement policies and certificates in this state shall provide a copy of any medicare supplement advertisement intended for use in this state whether through written, radio, or television medium to the director for review or approval by him or her to the extent review or approval may be required under state law.

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 236;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 26.